ext/fulltext/data/dicts/french/fulltext.dict
abstenir/smt
abêtirai/jnmtlx
accentuer/snmtlM
accommodante/LMF
accorder/snmtlM
accorderai/jnmtlx
accoutrais/jnmtlv
accumule/jnmtlu
accusatoire/LMS
aciduler/nmtlM
adaptable/LMS
admettrai/jnmtlx
administrer/snmtlM
admonestai/jnmtlw
advection/LMS
affaiblirai/jnmtlx
affermerai/jnmtlx
affouille/jnlu
affûtage/LMS
agenouiller/smt
agglomérer/snlM
agir/RMsn
agrippe/jnmtlu
aheurter/smt
aide/jnmtlu
aileron/SLMS
ailleurs/LMQ
alastrim/LMS
alimentais/jnmtlv
allongerai/jnmtlx
allouer/snmtlM
alléger/snmtlM
allégerai/jnmtlx
alors/MQU
alourdissement/LMS
alternative/LMF
ambitionnais/jnlv
amuseuse/LMG
aménageable/LMS
anathématiser/nmtlM
ancrai/jnmtlw
ancrais/jnmtlv
ancrer/snmtlM
anhélais/jnv
anneler/nlM
anophèle/LMS
antépénultième/LMS
apanage/jnlu
aphylle/LMS
appeler/snmtlM
appelle/jnmtlu
apposerai/jnmtlx
approfondir/snlM
aprioriste/LMS
après/LMQ
archaïsais/jnv
archicube/LMS
arpéger/nlM
arquais/jnmtlv
arque/jnmtlu
aryenne/LMF
aseptisais/jnmtlv
assemblage/LMS
assimiler/snlM
assoiffe/jnmtlu
assure/jnmtlu
astreignis/jnmtlw
atonique/LMS
atterre/jnmtlu
attifer/snmtlM
attirer/snmtlM
attrouper/snlM
au/QX
aucun/QM
aucune/QM
aujourd'hui/MQ
autour/Q
autovaccination/LMS
autrefois/MQ
auxquelles/M
avec/MQ
aveulissais/jnmtlv
aviez/nml
avérai/jnlw
axiomatisais/jnmtlv
bouillis/Dw
codeuse/DG
combinerai/Rx
compressais/Dv
compresser/Dy
confirai/Dx
confis/Dgw
connaîtrai/Rx
correctionnalise/U
couds/RDg
courais/Rv
couvrais/DRv
couvre/DRu
couvris/DRw
cueille/Ru
cuisis/Rw
destituai/e
disais/Rd
doue/U
démontre/Ru
déparasite/U
désembourgeoise/e
effaroucher/snmtlM
efficacité/LMS
eidétique/LMS
elle-même/QM
elle/QMS
elles-mêmes/QM
embaucherai/jnmtlx
embaumer/nmtlM
emboue/jnlu
emboutissais/jnmtlv
embrouiller/snmtlM
embrèle/jnlu
emmerde/jnmtlu
emmiellais/jnmtlv
empennerai/jnlx
empiler/snmtlM
empêchais/jnmtlv
empêtrai/jnmtlw
en/jsnmtlQU
encaissais/jnmtlv
encastrer/snmtlM
enchaînai/jnmtlw
enchifrener/nlM
encéphalographie/LMS
endotoxine/LMS
endêvais/jnmtlv
enfiche/jnlu
enflamme/jnmtlu
engloutir/snmtlM
engouer/smt
engourdir/DsnmtlM
enjoue/jnmtlu
enjuponner/nmtlM
enlaçais/jnmtlv
enrôler/snmtlM
entais/jnlv
enterrai/jnmtlw
enterrer/snmtlM
entre-nuire/smt
entrechoque/jnlu
entreprise/LMS
escalade/DLMS
escalader/nmtlM
escarmouche/LMS
escarrifierai/jnlx
espionner/snmtlM
essorais/jnmtlv
essore/jnmtlu
esthétisais/jnlv
estivante/LMF
eux-mêmes/QM
eux/MQ
exauçais/jnmtlv
excitais/jnmtlv
expliquer/snmtlM
exploratrice/LMG
expropriai/jnmntlw
expropriais/jnmtlv
expulser/snmtlM
expédie/jnmtlu
extradai/jnmtlw
exécrerai/jnmtlx
faisais/DRd
ferai/DRx
ficher/Dy
fixation/ABHPWS
formation/DS
heure/LMS
hier/MQ
homogénéifierai/knlx
humidité/LMS
hydraulicienne/LMF
hypothéquais/jnmtlv
hébéter/snmtlM
hémicycle/LMS
ici/MQ
idolâtrai/jnmtlw
il/sQS
iliaque/LMS
image/jnlu
immarcescible/LMS
immiscer/smt
immobilisais/jnmtlv
inactiverai/jnlx
inconcevable/LMS
incruster/snmtlM
indemniser/snmtlM
indiffère/jnmtlu
indifférenciée/LMF
inhume/jnlu
initialiserai/Rjnmtlx
innocentai/jnmtlw
innocentais/jnmtlv
inobservation/LMS
installerai/jnmtlx
insurger/smt
inséparable/LMS
intellectualiserai/jnlx
interprète/jnmtlu
invention/RLMS
inverser/snmtlM
invitai/jnmtlw
irriguais/jnmtlv
irrigue/jnmtlu
italianiser/snmtlM
italienne/LMF
lire/Ry
lus/Rw
maigrirai/Dx
maille/e
mettais/DRv
mouds/Rg
neige/R
obombrai/jnmtlw
oeuvrer/nM
on/LQ
opposerai/jnmtlx
opérable/LMS
ornementais/jnmtlv
orvale/LMS
ouille/jnmtlu
outiller/nmtlM
outillerai/jnmtlx
où/MU
paissais/Rv
pars/DR
partent/DR
partis/DRw
peignais/DRv
peins/DRu
plais/Dg
pleut/R
pleuvrait/R
positionnais/Rv
prenais/DRv
pressai/Cw
pressais/Cvc
presse/Cu
presser/Cy
presserai/Cx
pris/DRw
rivulair/Se
s'accotait/P
singularise/Du
ségrégée/f
tenir/DRz
trais/Rg
triglyph/Se
un/LQS
une/LQS
uranyle/LMS
urbaniser/snmtlM
valide/IJKS
valoir/PRz
valus/PRw
vaudrai/PRx
vernis/Ruw
vis/RPw
voir/RP
vois/RPg
voulus/Rw
voyais/Pvc
vue/RPF
vêtais/DRv
vêts/DRu
à/MQ
ébarber/nlM
ébauchais/jnmtlv
échangeai/jnmtlw
écimai/jnmtlw
éclairai/jnmtlw
éclater/snmtlM
écluser/nmtlM
égalai/jnmtlw
électrocute/jnmtlu
élevage/LMS
éliminatoire/LMS
éliminer/snmtlM
émousserai/jnmtlx
émulsionner/nlM
émèche/jnlu
époussetais/jnmtlv
épouvanter/snmtlM
érayerai/jnlx
éreintante/LMF
éteule/LMS
étouper/nmtlM
étouperai/jnmtlx
étudier/snmtlM
évaluation/RLMS
éventer/snmtlM
éventrai/jnmtlw
